Illinois, session 104th, HB4030.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Definitions of Sex-Based Terms Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose; application; findings. 7    (a) The purpose of this Act is to bring clarity, 8certainty, and uniformity to the laws of the State regarding 9sex discrimination, privacy, equality of the sexes, and 10benefits or services specifically provided to males and to 11females.12    (b) This Act shall apply wherever the State or an 13instrumentality of the State classifies people on the basis of 14sex or otherwise defines people as being female or male, women 15or men, girls or boys.16    (c) The General Assembly finds that:17        (1) males and females are legally equal, but they are 18    not the same;19        (2) males and females possess unique and immutable 20    biological differences that manifest prior to birth and 21    increase as they age and experience puberty;22        (3) these unique and immutable biological differences 23    mean that females and males are not similarly situated in   HB4030- 2 -LRB104 12898 BDA 24397 b1    all circumstances and are not interchangeable; and2        (4) inconsistencies in court rulings and policy 3    initiatives regarding sex discrimination and common 4    sex-based words have endangered women's rights and 5    resources and have put the existence of private, 6    single-sex spaces in jeopardy, thereby necessitating 7    clarification of certain terms used in State law. 8    Section 10. Definitions of terms used in State statutes 9and administrative rules. In determining the meaning of any 10statute or of any rule, regulation, or interpretation of the 11various administrative agencies of this State:12    "Boy" means a human male who is a legal minor under the 13laws of Illinois, provided that the use of "boy" in reference 14to the participation of a high-school-aged individual in a 15school or extracurricular program shall not be understood to 16exclude the participation of a student who is legally an 17adult.18    "Father" means a male parent of a child or children as 19defined in Illinois law. 20    "Female" means, when this term is used in reference to a 21natural person, an individual who naturally has, had, will 22have through the course of normal development, or would have 23but for a developmental anomaly, genetic anomaly, or accident 24the reproductive system that at some point produces ova.25    "Girl" means a human female who is a legal minor under the   HB4030- 3 -LRB104 12898 BDA 24397 b1laws of Illinois, provided that the use of "girl" in reference 2to the participation of a high-school-aged individual in a 3school or extracurricular program shall not be understood to 4exclude the participation of a student who is legally an 5adult.6    "Male" means, when this term is used in reference to a 7natural person, an individual who naturally has, had, will 8have through the course of normal development, or would have 9but for a developmental anomaly, genetic anomaly, or accident 10the reproductive system that at some point produces sperm. 11    "Man" means an adult human of the male sex. 12    "Mother" means a female parent of a child or children as 13defined in Illinois law.14    "Sex" means, when this term is used to classify or 15describe a natural person, the state of being either male or 16female as observed or clinically verified at birth. "Sex" 17includes only 2 sexes, and every individual is either male or 18female, and individuals with congenital and medically 19verifiable differences in sex development, disorders in sex 20development, or intersex conditions, are not members of a 21third sex and must be accommodated consistent with State and 22federal law. "Sex" does not include "gender identity" or any 23other term intended to convey a person's subjective sense of 24self; "gender identity" and other subjective terms are not 25synonyms or substitutes for "sex".26    "Woman" means an adult human of the female sex.   HB4030- 4 -LRB104 12898 BDA 24397 b1    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 2severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.